New York, session 2025-2026, S8090.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of paragraph (a) of subdivi- 2 sion 1 of section 58 of the civil service law, as amended by section 4 3 of part C of chapter 55 of the laws of 2025, are amended and a new 4 subparagraph (iv) is added to read as follows: 5 (ii) such maximum age requirement of forty-three years shall not apply 6 to any police officer as defined in subdivision thirty-four of section 7 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, who was continuously employed by the 8 Buffalo municipal housing authority between January first, two thousand 9 five and June thirtieth, two thousand five and who takes the next writ- 10 ten exam offered after the effective date of this subparagraph by the 11 city of Buffalo civil service commission for employment as a police 12 officer in the city of Buffalo police department, or June thirtieth, two 13 thousand six, whichever is later; [and] 14 (iii) such maximum age requirement of forty-three years shall not 15 apply to any police officer of any county, town, city or village police 16 force not otherwise provided for in this section if the eligible list 17 has been exhausted and there are no other eligible candidates; provided, 18 however, the police officer themselves are on the eligible list of such 19 county, town, city or village and meet all other requirements of merit 20 and fitness set forth by this chapter and do not exceed the maximum age 21 of forty-three; and 22 (iv) such maximum age requirement of forty-three years shall not apply 23 to any police officer of any county, city, town or village police force 24 not otherwise provided for in this section if such officer is a part- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10805-02-5 S. 8090 2 1 time police officer in a non-competitive position and is vested in the 2 New York state and local police and fire retirement system; 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 4 manner as section 4 of part C of chapter 55 of the laws of 2025, takes 5 effect.